Arkansas, session 2025, HB1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Many electric vehicles are being made with components
created through the use of forced labor, including materials mined by Uyghur
and other Muslim minorities in the People's Republic of China's Xinjiang
Uyghur Autonomous Region;
(2) Concerns about the use of forced labor to create these
components and materials prompted the United States Government to pass the
Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act, Pub. L. No. 117-78, with overwhelming
bipartisan support;
*JLL056*
04-03-2025 11:39:58 JLL056

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1683
(3) Under the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act, Pub. L. No.
117-78, there is a rebuttable presumption that any product manufactured in
whole or in part in the Xinjiang Uyghur Autonomous Region was produced by
forced labor;
(4) The United States Government recently restricted the
application of its newly created tax credits for electric vehicles so that
"[b]eginning in 2024, an eligible clean vehicle may not contain any battery
components that are manufactured by a foreign entity of concern, and
beginning in 2025, an eligible clean vehicle may not contain any critical
minerals that were extracted, processed, or recycled by a foreign entity of
concern";
(5) The United States Government recently proposed a regulation
for another act that any company subject to the People's Republic of China's
jurisdiction will be defined as a "foreign entity of concern," which would
prevent federal tax credits from supporting sales of electric vehicles made
with battery components from entities of the People's Republic of China;
(6) Many electric vehicles are also being made with components
created through the use of oppressive child labor, most notably, through
cobalt ore mined in dangerous conditions by thousands of young children in
the Democratic Republic of the Congo and sent to the People's Republic of
China for use in manufacturing lithium-ion batteries;
(7) The United States Government recently concluded that
"downstream products containing lithium-ion batteries may be produced with an
input produced with child labor, such as electric cars";
(8) The use of forced labor is repugnant and deplorable,
violates basic human rights, constitutes unacceptable discrimination, and
damages free and fair competition; and
(9) State governments should take steps to ensure that taxpayer
dollars are not being used to pay for electric vehicles that may have been
partially manufactured through forced labor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-130. Purchase of electric vehicle.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is propelled
04-03-2025 11:39:58 JLL056

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1683
to a significant extent by an electric motor that draws electricity from a
battery that is capable of being recharged from an external source of
electricity;
(2) "Forced labor" means labor or service that is:
(A) Obtained by force, fraud, or coercion, including by:
(i) Threat of serious harm to or physical restraint
against any person;
(ii) Means of a scheme, plan, or pattern intended to
cause the person to believe that if the person did not perform the labor or
services, the person or another person would suffer serious harm or physical
restraint; or
(iii) Means of the abuse or threatened abuse of law
or the legal process;
(B) Imposed on the basis of a characteristic protected by
the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et seq.;
(C) Not offered or provided voluntarily by the worker; or
(D) Produced through a condition of employment under which
a person under the age of fourteen (14) years of age is employed in an
occupation hazardous for the employment of children, including without
limitation manufacturing or mining; and
(3) "Governmental entity" means a:
(A) State agency, including without limitation any
department, agency, board, commission, office, and other authority of the
state;
(B) Political subdivision of the state, including without
limitation a county, municipality, public school district, water district,
and improvement district; and
(C) College, university, authority, or other enterprise
operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state.
(b) A governmental entity shall not enter into a contract for the
procurement of an electric vehicle or a component of an electric vehicle
unless the manufacturer of the electric vehicle or component of an electric
vehicle in good faith provides the governmental entity a sworn certification
that certifies that no entity involved in the production of the electric
vehicle or the component of an electric vehicle being sold, including the
production of a constituent part or the mining or other sourcing of materials
04-03-2025 11:39:58 JLL056

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1683
for the electric vehicle or the component of an electric vehicle, used forced
labor in its activities.
(c)(1) In addition to any other remedies available at law or equity,
if the manufacturer or seller is found to have knowingly provided false or
misleading information under subsection (b) of this section, a civil penalty
shall be imposed against the manufacturer for the greater of:
(A) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each false or
misleading statement; or
(B) One-half (1/2) of the total price paid by the
governmental entity for the electric vehicle or the component of an electric
vehicle.
(2) A governmental entity that is found to have knowingly
violated subsection (b) of this section shall pay to the state the greater
of:
(A) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each false or
misleading statement; or
(B) The total price paid by the governmental entity for
the electric vehicle or the component of an electric vehicle.
(3) An employee of a governmental entity who is found to have
knowingly violated subsection (b) of this section shall be found to be acting
outside the course and scope of his or her employment and is personally
liable for a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to the state.
(4) Each member of a board who votes in the affirmative to authorize
the purchase of an electric vehicle that is found to violate subsection (b)
of this section shall personally pay a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000)
to the state.
(d) This section applies to a procurement contract for an
electric vehicle or a component of an electric vehicle that is entered into,
amended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this act.

/s/McAlindon





04-03-2025 11:39:58 JLL056